New Jersey, session 222, S4344.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Access Link has the same meaning as that term is defined in section 2 of P.L.2016, c.25 (C.27:25-5c.). Amtrak means the National Railroad Passenger Corporation, a corporation organized under 49 U.S.C. s.24101 et seq. and the laws of the District of Columbia. Commissioner means the Commissioner of Transportation. Corporation means the New Jersey Transit Corporation. Mean distance between failure means the measure of the average distance traveled by vehicles before maintenance or repairs are required. Motorbus regular route service has the same meaning as that term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-3). Rail passenger service has the same meaning as that term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-3), but does not include light rail service. b.    On a monthly basis, the corporation shall publish on its Internet website information related to the performance of the corporations rail passenger service, which information shall include, but shall not be limited to: (1)   the total number of rail passenger service cancellations occurring each month; (2)   the causes of all rail passenger service cancellations that occur each month, including, but not limited to, cancellations caused by: (a)   issues related to Amtrak; (b)   staffing shortages; (c)   weather, trespasser, or similarly-unpreventable incidents; (d)   any issues with rail infrastructure, including equipment malfunction, mechanical failure, and signalization disruption; and (e)   carryover from prolonged network delays; (3)   the on-time performance of rail passenger service and mean distance between failure of the corporations rail passenger service; (4)   the on-time performance of rail passenger service and mean distance between failure of the corporations rail passenger service, adjusted for issues related to Amtrak; (5)   the mean distance between failure for each passenger car; and (6)   any other information that the commissioner deems appropriate to inform commuters of rail passenger service performance. c.     On a monthly basis, the corporation shall publish on its Internet website information related to the performance of the corporations light rail service, which information shall include, but shall not be limited to: (1)   the on-time performance of light rail service and mean distance between failure of the corporations light rail service; and (2)   any other information that the commissioner deems appropriate to inform commuters of light rail service performance. d.    On a monthly basis, the corporation shall publish on its Internet website information related to the performance of the corporations motorbus regular route service, which information shall include, but shall not be limited to: (1)   the on-time performance of motorbus regular route service, including the on-time performance of motorbus regular route service departing from the Atlantic City Bus Terminal, Hoboken Terminal, Irvington Bus Terminal, Newark Penn Station, Port Authority Bus Terminal, and Walter Rand Transportation Center; (2)   the mean distance between failure of the corporations motorbus regular route service; and (3)   any other information that the commissioner deems appropriate to inform commuters of motorbus regular route service performance. e.     On a monthly basis, the corporation shall publish on its Internet website information related to the performance of the corporations Access Link service, which information shall include, but shall not be limited to: (1)   the on-time performance of Access Link service; and (2)   any other information that the commissioner deems appropriate to inform commuters of Access Link service performance. f.     Nothing in this section shall affect the corporations duty to report on-time performance of rail passenger service in an annual report pursuant to subsection b. of section 20 of P.L.1979, c.150 (C.27:25-20). 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.